Nevada, session 83, SB336.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. Chapter 608 of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto the provisions set forth as sections 2, 3 and 4 of this act.
Sec. 2. 1. A natural person who is a resident of this State
may open a portable benefit account if the person works as a sole
proprietor or an independent contractor during the calendar year
in which the person opens the account.
2. The holder of a portable benefit account may make
contributions to the portable benefit account during any calendar
year in which the holder works as a sole proprietor or independent
contractor.
3. Distributions from a portable benefit account that are
made in compliance with the requirements of section 3 of this act
may be used for the benefit of the holder of the account or a
spouse, domestic partner, child or other dependent of the holder of
the account.
4. As used in this section, “portable benefit account” means
an account that meets the requirements of section 3 of this act.
Sec. 3. 1. A portable benefit account must be offered
through and administered by a bank, credit union, investment
manager or other provider or program that offers services through
a bank, credit union or investment manager.
2. Distributions from a portable benefit account may only be
made for the:
(a) Payment of costs relating to:
(1) Maintaining health insurance coverage, including,
without limitation, premiums, copays, deductibles or coinsurance;
(2) Coverage for or the purchase of prescription drugs;
(3) Any agreement or arrangement for the payment of
medical expenses; or
(4) Other out-of-pocket medical expenses; or
-
*SB336_R1*

– 3 –
(b) Payment of costs relating to or an investment in other
benefits, including, without limitation, income replacement
insurance, life insurance or an individual retirement account.
3. As used in this section:
(a) “Bank” has the meaning ascribed to it in NRS 657.016.
(b) “Credit union” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 672.070.
Sec. 4. 1. A person who contracts for the services of a sole
proprietor or an independent contractor may contribute money to
a portable benefit account which is held by the sole proprietor or
independent contractor.
2. A contribution made pursuant to subsection 1 may be
based on withholding a percentage of payment otherwise owed to
the sole proprietor or independent contractor, if:
(a) In the contract for services or a notice accompanying the
contract, an explanation of the optional withholding is clear,
unambiguous and prominently displayed;
(b) The contract for services or a notice accompanying the
contract requires the sole proprietor or independent contractor to
indicate his or her intention to opt in or opt out of the
withholding;
(c) The sole proprietor or independent contractor expressly
agrees in writing to opt in to the withholding; and
(d) The sole proprietor or independent contractor has the right
to opt out of the withholding at any time without penalty.
3. The fact that a contribution is made to a portable benefit
account pursuant to this section is, in and of itself, insufficient to
support any determination by the Labor Commissioner as to
whether or not the holder of the account should be classified as an
employee. If the Labor Commissioner considers any such
contribution in any proceeding or determination relating to such
classification, including, without limitation, pursuant to NRS
607.217, 608.0155, 608.400 or 608.410, the Labor Commissioner
shall not make a determination that a person was not properly
classified unless the Labor Commissioner makes at least three
other findings of fact in support of the determination.
4. As used in this section, “portable benefit account” means
an account that meets the requirements of section 3 of this act.
Sec. 5. This act becomes effective on July 1, 2025.
H
-
*SB336_R1*